dictionaries/an_ES/an_ES.dic
abordar/ACDE
absolver/GCDE
absorber/ACDE
acabar/ACDE
achugar/ACDE
aclarir/ACDE
acomodar/ACDE
actualizar/ACDE
adaptar/ACDE
admirar/ACDE
adquirir/GCDE
aduyar/ACDE
afeminar/ACDE
agafar/ACDE
agravar/ACDE
agredir/ACDE
alargar/ACDE
alimentar/ACDE
aliniar/ACDE
alochar/ACDE
amagar/ACDE
amodorrar/ACDE
amostrar/GCDE
anexionar/ACDE
anteposar/ACDE
anular/ACDE
aplanar/ACDE
aprebar/ACDE
aprender/ACDE
apuntar/ACDE
arribar/ACDE
articular/ACDE
asentar/GCDE
asistir/ACDE
asperar/ACDE
atenuar/ACDE
aterrizar/ACDE
atrapar/ACDE
autoproclamar/ACDE
aviellir/ACDE
badallar/ACD
beber/ACD
bendecir/ACD
bordar/ACD
brilar/ACD
cagar/ACD
calcular/ACD
cantar/ACD
capturar/ACD
cavar/ACD
cazar/ACD
chapurquiar/ACD
charrar/ACD
chudgar/ACD
chugar/GCD
cocinar/ACD
cometer/ACD
compareixer/ACD
complir/ACD
composar/ACD
concentrar/ACD
concorrer/ACD
connectar/ACD
conseguir/ACD
constatar/ACD
contar/ACD
continar/ACD
coordinar/ACD
cubrir/ACD
decayer/ACD
degollar/ACD
desafiar/ACD
desayunar/ACD
desembocar/ACD
desfrutar/ACD
desmontar/ACD
desobedeixer/ACD
destruir/ACD
detener/ACD
diferenciar/ACD
dilatar/ACD
disputar/ACD
distribuir/ACD
dominar/ACD
dotar/ACD
editar/ACDE
elaborar/ACDE
eliminar/ACDE
embarcar/ACDE
embolsar/ACDE
emocionar/ACDE
empapar/ACDE
emparetar/ACDE
emplegar/ACDE
empuixar/ACDE
encadenar/ACDE
encaixar/ACDE
encegar/ACDE
enchegar/ACDE
enchufar/ACDE
encolar/ACDE
endrogar/ACDE
enfrentar/ACDE
enfriar/ACDE
engrasar/ACDE
enlazar/ACDE
enreligar/ACDE
enrobinar/ACDE
enronar/ACDE
entender/GCDE
entrenar/ACDE
entristir/ACDE
esbarar/ACDE
escaldar/ACDE
escalfar/ACDE
escapar/ACDE
escolorir/ACDE
esconfiar/ACDE
esculpir/ACDE
escupir/ACDE
esferrar/ACDE
esfilar/ACDE
esgarrar/ACDE
esleyir/ACDE
eslizar/ACDE
esmolar/ACDE
especular/ACDE
espentar/ACDE
espiar/ACDE
espleitar/ACDE
espuntar/ACDE
estabilizar/ACDE
estafar/ACDE
estallar/ACDE
esvarizar/ACDE
evadir/ACDE
evaporar/ACDE
evolucionar/ACDE
exclamar/ACDE
exercer/ACDE
exercitar/ACDE
exiliar/ACDE
exposar/ACDE
exprimir/ACDE
fablar/ACD
ferir/ACD
ferrar/ACD
formalizar/ACD
formar/ACD
fumigar/ACD
gratar/ACD
honrar/ACD
ignorar/ACDE
implorar/ACDE
imposar/ACDE
imprimir/ACDE
incorporar/ACDE
indignar/ACDE
influir/ACDE
insinuar/ACDE
instituir/ACDE
integrar/ACDE
intimidar/ACDE
intuir/ACDE
inundar/ACDE
inventar/ACDE
ixafegar/ACDE
labrar/ACD
lanzar/ACD
limpiar/ACD
logar/ACD
maniar/ACD
marabillar/ACD
matricular/ACD
meniar/ACD
mezclar/ACD
monitorizar/ACD
mullar/ACD
negar/ACD
nombrar/ACD
obstaculizar/ACDE
ocupar/ACDE
odiar/ACDE
ofrir/ACDE
organizar/ACDE
oscilar/ACDE
otilar/ACDE
pecar/ACD
pedricar/ACD
permenar/ACD
placer/ACD
poder/GCD
portiar/ACD
predisposar/ACD
preguntar/ACD
presentar/GCD
pretender/ACD
prochectar/ACD
prohibir/ACD
proscribir/ACD
punchar/ACD
querer/GCD
razonar/ACD
realizar/ACD
reclamar/ACD
recomendar/GCD
redotar/ACD
regar/ACD
reimprentar/ACD
remarcar/ACD
remenar/ACD
replegar/ACD
representar/ACD
resistir/ACD
responder/ACD
restaurar/ACD
retallar/ACD
retocar/ACD
rezar/ACD
rifar/ACD
sacar/ACD
sacrificar/ACD
satisfer/ACD
secundar/ACD
simplificar/ACD
sinyalar/ACD
sobrevivir/ACD
sofreyir/ACD
soportar/ACD
sozmeter/ACD
subsanar/ACD
superar/ACD
suposar/ACD
tapizar/ACD
telefoniar/ACD
tomar/ACD
transcribir/ACD
tremolar/ACD
trucar/ACD
ubrir/ACDE
usar/ACDE
vaciar/ACD
veraniar/ACD
vestir/ACD
volar/GCD
vulcar/ACD
abaixar/ACDE
abocar/ACDE
aburguilar/ACDE
acayeixer/ACDE
acercar/ACDE
acilitrompar/ACDE
aclachar/ACDE
acusar/ACDE
adornar/ACDE
aerotransportar/ACDE
aforzar/GDCE
agrandir/ACDE
agregar/ACDE
alentar/GCDE
amenester/ACDE
amuntonar/ACDE
apabilar/ACDE
apartar/ACDE
apuyalar/ACDE
ascuitar/ADCE
atorgar/ACDE
autentificar/ACDE
bastar/ACD
brotar/ACD
caminar/ACD
churriar/ACD
codificar/ACD
comencipiar/ADC
contrimostrar/ACD
corromper/ACD
deificar/ACD
desasperar/ACD
descalcificar/ACD
desmitificar/ACD
disenyar/ADC
dosificar/ACD
embalar/ACDE
emporquiar/ACDE
emprencipiar/ADCE
encaragolar/ACDE
encletar/ACDE
endevinar/ACDE
endizcar/ACDE
engrandar/ACDE
enterar/ADCE
entrecruciar/ACDE
enunciar/ACDE
errar/ACDE
escachilar/ACDE
escanyar/ACDE
escorrer/ACDE
escureixer/ACDE
esmicazar/ACDE
esmutilar/ACDE
estirar/ACDE
estornudar/ACDE
evitar/ACDE
exacherar/ACDE
fluidificar/ACD
fructificar/ACD
inaugurar/ACDE
indagar/ACDE
intercalar/ACDE
invitar/ACDE
lobar/ACD
manar/ACD
migolar/ACD
namorar/ADC
ordenar/ADCEE
pegar/ACD
perseguir/GDC
portar/ACD
preexistir/ACD
reconducir/ACD
recontar/GCD
requerir/ACD
retacular/ACD
sobrepasar/ACD
succeder/ACD
tipificar/ACD
trancar/ACD
zaboyar/ACD
estato/E
estiés/E
estasetz/E
estarás/E
estamos/E
fuese/E
habida/E
han/E
habrá/E
hesen/E
habiemos/E
fer/CDEH
fetz/CDEH
faciés/EH
ficiemos/EH
feremos/EH
feríanos/EH
faiga/EH
ida/E
vaigan/CDE
cabemos/CDE
accionarialment/F
adhesivament/F
agorrencament/F
allí/F
analfabetament/F
antiglobalizadorament/F
aquaticament/F
asaltantment/F
atleticament/F
avarament/F
electronicament/F
encaridament/F
entranyablement/F
erraticament/F
espavoridament/F
esterilment/F
eternament/F
exhaustament/F
exteriorment/F
ideolochizadament/F
immemorialment/F
impermeyablement/F
inacabadament/F
incisivament/F
incorrectament/F
indispensablement/F
infatigablement/F
inhumanament/F
insignement/F
intelectualment/F
interplanetariament/F
invalidament/F
irreprochablement/F
obviament/F
operisticament/F
out/F
usualment/F
acampador/BF
adaptación/BF
admisibilidat/BF
agricultor/BF
alochamiento/BF
alzamiento/BF
amplitut/BF
antiparlamentarismo/BF
aparador/BF
archivador/BF
asturianismo/BF
atracción/BF
autoorganización/BF
banyador/B
borrador/B
calzador/B
casta/B
chenero/B
ciudat/B
comparación/B
conservación/B
credibilidat/B
decorador/B
despolarización/B
docilidat/B
edat/BF
eliminatoria/BF
empanadiella/BF
enumeración/BF
escarlatina/BF
escopeta/BF
espina/BF
estau/BF
estornillador/BF
exclusividat/BF
extremenyo/BF
filosofía/B
fuesa/B
griego/B
hamaca/BF
hostilidat/BF
humor/BF
imposibilidat/BF
inferioridat/BF
influencia/BF
intención/BF
ixada/BF
j/B
limpieza/B
maquina/B
mezquita/B
mormonismo/B
neoplatonismo/B
omisión/BF
opresor/BF
otomano/BF
periodo/B
productor/B
remordimiento/B
sesión/B
tinta/B
vecino/B
ACB/BF
AKP/BF
altitut/BF
antimilitarista/BF
asonancia/BF
CAC/B
comandancia/B
desleyaltat/B
ecoeficiencia/BF
emperador/BF
esporte/BF
EUiA/BF
exichencia/BF
hiperreferencia/B
impedancia/BF
ineptitut/BF
interpresario/BF
largura/B
neoclasicista/B
oftalmolochía/BF
plazo/B
repugnancia/B
terminolochía/B
UBS/BF
URSS/BF
YZR/B
anvista/BF
cotidianidat/B
aconfesional/BF
agresivo/BF
ancestral/BF
anglicano/BF
aplicable/BF
asexual/BF
autonomo/BF
binario/B
clerical/B
curioso/B
enfermo/BF
entusiasta/BF
especifico/BF
estrumental/BF
expansionista/BF
fatigoso/B
hispanico/B
immigratorio/BF
incapaz/BF
inductivo/BF
intacto/BF
intencional/BF
invariable/BF
marcial/B
nervioso/B
olfativo/BF
perezoso/B
prudent/B
scientifico/B
televisivo/B
ubierto/BF
venerable/B
abismal/BF
administrable/BF
alicionador/BF
ameno/BF
antinatural/BF
asaltant/BF
aulico/BF
biomedico/B
competencial/B
descartable/B
electroquimico/BF
elevador/BF
endoplasmatico/BF
equivocau/BF
espavoriu/BF
esvaroso/BF
europeizau/BF
explicable/BF
fraudulento/B
idilico/BF
imbecil/BF
immortal/BF
impune/BF
indeseyable/BF
indulchent/BF
innegable/BF
interplanetario/BF
introductorio/BF
matinal/B
obedient/BF
oculto/BF
poregoso/B
reciproco/B
simplificador/B
toxicomano/B
basico/B
esclatero/BF
ista/EF
ixos/EF
ella/EF
aquello/EF
ixa/EF
unatro/EF
unos/EF
altrament/EF
Adena/BF
Adriana/BF
Aitona/BF
Alboraig/BF
Alcalalí/BF
Alexander/BF
Almenara/BF
Almoster/BF
Amice/BF
Ann/BF
Annan/BF
Aramunt/BF
Aristóteles/BF
Arjona/BF
Ártico/BF
Aurèlia/BF
Aurrekoetxea/BF
Barbate/B
Belenguer/B
Beraza/B
Bolonia/B
Buenaventura/B
Campillo/B
Casasses/B
Chaira/B
Coepa/B
Cristóbal/B
Domingo/B
EDIF/BF
Elx/BF
Emilio/BF
Escribano/BF
Estela/BF
Estévez/BF
Extremadura/BF
Ferrández/B
Franco/B
Gatxagaetxebarria/B
Granell/B
Heidi/B
IIP/BF
Insalud/BF
Ivona/BF
Jané/B
Juliana/B
l'Aleixar/B
Linyola/B
Lucy/B
Maón/B
Matarredona/B
Midi/B
Montagut/B
Mugica/B
Niue/B
Onda/BF
Orihuel/BF
Otxoa/BF
Parcent/B
Perry/B
Pontevedra/B
Rafa/B
Ridao/B
Rovira/B
Sandro/B
Seró/B
SSL/B
Tarragona/B
Tormo/B
UPN/BF
Vicente/B
Wagner/B
Zarzoso/B
